Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 67.28.181 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislative body of any municipality may impose an excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. The rate of tax shall not exceed the lesser of two percent or a rate that, when combined with all other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging within the municipality under this chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals ((twelve))12 percent. A tax under this chapter shall not be imposed in increments smaller than tenths of a percent.(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:(a) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this chapter or RCW 67.40.100 or both with a total rate exceeding four percent before July 27, 1997, such total authorization shall continue through January 31, 1999, and thereafter the municipality may impose a tax under this section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually imposed by the municipality on January 31, 1999.(b) If a city or town, other than a municipality imposing a tax under (a) of this subsection, is located in a county that imposed taxes under this chapter with a total rate of four percent or more on January 1, 1997, the city or town may not impose a tax under this section.(c) If a city has a population of ((four hundred thousand))200,000 or more and is located in a county with a population of ((one million))500,000 or more, the rate of tax imposed under this chapter by the city shall not exceed the lesser of four percent or a rate that, when combined with all other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging in the municipality under this chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals ((fifteen and two-tenths))15.2 percent.(d) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this chapter or RCW 67.40.100, or both, at a rate equal to six percent before January 1, 1998, the municipality may impose a tax under this section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually imposed by the municipality on January 1, 1998.(3) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section shall contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon the same taxable event.(4) In determining the effective combined rate of tax for purposes of the limit in subsections (1) and (2)(c) of this section, the tax rate under RCW 82.14.530 is not included.Sec. 2. RCW 36.100.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) One or more public facilities districts may be created in any county and must be coextensive with the boundaries of the county.(2) A public facilities district is created upon adoption of a resolution providing for the creation of such a district by the county legislative authority in which the proposed district is located.(3) A public facilities district is a municipal corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.(4) ((Except as provided in RCW 36.100.040 (4) and (5), no taxes authorized under this chapter may be assessed or levied unless a majority of the voters of the public facilities district has approved such tax at a general or special election. A single ballot proposition may both validate the imposition of the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.048 and the excise tax under RCW 36.100.040(1).(5)))(a) A public facilities district constitutes a body corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, including contracts with public and private parties, to acquire, own, sell, transfer, lease, and otherwise acquire or dispose of property, to grant concessions under terms approved by the public facilities district, and to sue and be sued.(b) A public facilities district created by a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 or more to acquire, own, and operate a convention and trade center transferred from a public nonprofit corporation may continue to contract with the Seattle-King county convention and visitors' bureau or its successor in interest for marketing the convention and trade center facility and services.(((6)))(5) A public facilities district may enter into contracts with a county for the purpose of exercising any powers of a community renewal agency under chapter 35.81 RCW.(((7)))(6) The legislative authority of a city or county, the board of directors of a public nonprofit corporation, or the state of Washington may transfer property to a public facilities district created under this chapter, with or without consideration. No property that is encumbered with debt or that is in need of major capital renovation may be transferred to the district without the agreement of the district and revenues adequate to retire the existing indebtedness.(((8)))(7) A public facilities district may enter into agreements with the state, any municipal corporation, or any other governmental entity for the design, financing, acquisition, development, construction, reconstruction, lease, remodeling, alteration, maintenance, equipping, reequipping, repair, operation, or management of one or more facilities of the parties thereto. Agreements may provide that any party to the contract designs, finances, acquires, develops, constructs, reconstructs, remodels, alters, maintains, equips, reequips, repairs, and operates one or more facilities for the other party or parties to the contract. A public facilities district may enter into an agreement with the state, any municipal corporation, or other public or private entity that will assist a public facilities district in the financing of all or any part of a district facility on such terms as may be determined by agreement between the respective parties, including without limitation by a loan, guaranty, or other financing agreement.Sec. 3. RCW 36.100.040 and 2025 c 376 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((A))The board of a public facilities district may impose an excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on any premises having fewer than 40 lodging units. ((Except for any tax imposed under subsection (4) or (5) of this section, if a public facilities district has not imposed such an excise tax prior to December 31, 1995, the public facilities district may only impose the excise tax if a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of the tax has been approved by a simple majority vote of voters of the public facilities district voting on the proposition.))(2) The rate of the tax may not exceed two percent and the proceeds of the tax may only be used for the acquisition, design, construction, remodeling, maintenance, equipping, reequipping, repairing, and operation of its public facilities. This excise tax may not be imposed until the district has approved the proposal to acquire, design, and construct the public facilities.(3) Except for a public facilities district created within a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))500,000 or more for the purpose of acquiring, owning, and operating a convention and trade center or performing arts center, a public facilities district may not impose the tax authorized in this section if, after the tax authorized in this section was imposed, the effective combined rate of state and local excise taxes, including sales and use taxes and excise taxes on lodging, imposed on the sale of or charge made for furnishing of lodging in any jurisdiction in the public facilities district exceeds eleven and one-half percent.(4)(a) To replace the tax authorized by former RCW 67.40.090, a public facilities district created within a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 or more for the purpose of acquiring, owning, operating, renovating, and expanding a convention and trade center may impose an excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging (including but not limited to any short-term rental) that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on:(i) Any premises:(A) Having fewer than 60 lodging units if the premises is located in a town with a population less than ((three hundred))300; or(B) Classified as a hostel;(ii) Any lodging that is concurrently subject to a tax on engaging in the business of being a short-term rental operator imposed by a city in which a convention and trade center is located; or(iii) Any lodging that is operated by a university health care system exclusively for family members of patients.(b) The rate of the tax may not exceed seven percent within the portion of the district that corresponds to the boundaries of the largest city within the public facilities district and may not exceed 2.8 percent in the remainder of the district. The tax imposed under this subsection (4) may not be collected prior to the transfer date defined in RCW 36.100.230.(5) To replace the tax authorized by former RCW 67.40.130, a public facilities district created within a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 or more for the purpose of acquiring, owning, operating, renovating, and expanding a convention and trade center may impose an additional excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging (including but not limited to any short-term rental) that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on any premises: (a) Having fewer than ((sixty))60 lodging units if the premises is located in a town with a population less than ((three hundred))300; or (b) classified as a hostel. The rate of the additional excise tax may not exceed two percent and may be imposed only within the portion of the district that corresponds to the boundaries of the largest city within the public facilities district and may not be imposed in the remainder of the district. The tax imposed under this subsection (5) may not be collected prior to the transfer date specified in RCW 36.100.230. The tax imposed under this subsection (5) must be credited against the amount of the tax otherwise due to the state from those same taxpayers under chapter 82.08 RCW. The tax under this subsection (5) may be imposed only for the purpose of paying or securing the payment of the principal of and interest on obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district and paying annual payment amounts to the state under subsection (6)(a) of this section. The authority to impose the additional excise tax under this subsection (5) expires on the date that is the earlier of (i) July 1, 2029, or (ii) the date on which all obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district to implement any redemption, prepayment, or legal defeasance of outstanding obligations under RCW 36.100.230(3)(a) are no longer outstanding.(6)(a) Commencing with the first full fiscal year of the state after the transfer date defined in RCW 36.100.230 and for so long as a public facilities district imposes a tax under subsection (5) of this section, the public facilities district must transfer to the state of Washington on June 30th of each state fiscal year an annual payment amount.(b) For the purposes of this subsection (6), "annual payment amount" means an amount equal to revenues received by the public facilities district in the fiscal year from the additional excise tax imposed under subsection (5) of this section plus an interest charge calculated on one-half the annual payment amount times an interest rate equal to the average annual rate of return for the prior calendar year in the Washington state local government investment pool created in chapter 43.250 RCW.(c)(i) If the public facilities district in any fiscal year is required to apply additional lodging excise tax revenues to the payment of principal and interest on obligations it issues or incurs, and the public facilities district is unable to pay all or any portion of the annual payment amount to the state, the deficiency is deemed to be a loan from the state to the public facilities district for the purpose of assisting the district in paying such principal and interest and must be repaid by the public facilities district to the state after providing for the payment of the principal of and interest on obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district, all on terms established by an agreement between the state treasurer and the public facilities district executed prior to the transfer date. Any agreement between the state treasurer and the public facilities district must specify the term for the repayment of the deficiency in the annual payment amount with an interest rate equal to the twenty bond general obligation bond buyer index plus one percentage point.(ii) Outstanding obligations to repay any loans deemed to have been made to the public facilities district as provided in any such agreements between the state treasurer and the public facilities district survive the expiration of the additional excise tax under subsection (5) of this section.(iii) For the purposes of this subsection (6)(c), "additional lodging excise tax revenues" mean the tax revenues received by the public facilities district under subsection (5) of this section.(7) A public facilities district is authorized to pledge any of its revenues, including without limitation revenues from the taxes authorized in this section, to pay or secure the payment of obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district, subject to the terms established by the board of directors of the public facilities district. So long as a pledge of the taxes authorized under this section is in effect, the legislature may not withdraw or modify the authority to levy and collect the taxes at the rates permitted under this section and may not increase the annual payment amount to be transferred to the state under subsection (6) of this section.(8) The department of revenue must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the public facilities district at no cost to the district, and the state treasurer must distribute those taxes as available on a monthly basis to the district or, upon the direction of the district, to a fiscal agent, paying agent, or trustee for obligations issued or incurred by the district.(9) Except as expressly provided in this chapter, all of the provisions contained in RCW 82.08.050 and 82.08.060 and chapter 82.32 RCW have full force and application with respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this section.(10) In determining the effective combined rate of tax for purposes of the limit in subsection (3) of this section, the tax rate under RCW 82.14.530 is not included.(11) The taxes imposed in this section do not apply to sales of temporary medical housing exempt under RCW 82.08.997.(12) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Community-initiated equitable development" means strategic capacity-building and capital investments that are determined and directed by communities who have experienced significant historical and ongoing social and economic vulnerabilities with the purpose to offset disparities, prevent or reduce displacement, address marginalization, and improve access to opportunities, resources, and outcomes.(b)(i) "Hostel" means a structure or facility where a majority of the rooms for sleeping accommodations are hostel dormitories containing a minimum of four standard beds designed for single-person occupancy within the facility. Hostel accommodations are supervised and must include at least one common area and at least one common kitchen for guest use.(ii) For the purpose of this subsection (12)(b), "hostel dormitory" means a single room, containing four or more standard beds designed for single-person occupancy, used exclusively as nonprivate communal sleeping quarters, generally for unrelated persons, where such persons independently acquire the right to occupy individual beds, with the operator supervising and determining which bed each person will occupy.(c) "Short-term rental" means a lodging use, that is not a hotel or motel, in which a dwelling unit, or portion thereof, that is offered or provided to a guest or guests by a short-term rental operator for a fee for fewer than ((thirty))30 consecutive nights. The term "short-term rental" does not include:(i) A dwelling unit, or portion thereof, that is used by the same person for ((thirty))30 or more consecutive nights; and(ii) A dwelling unit, or portion thereof, that is operated by an organization or government entity that is registered as a charitable organization with the secretary of state, state of Washington, and/or is classified by the federal internal revenue service as a public charity or a private foundation, and provides temporary housing to individuals who are being treated for trauma, injury, or disease and/or their family members.(13) Taxes authorized under subsections (4) and (5) of this section are deemed to have been imposed on December 1, 2000, for the purposes of RCW 82.14.410.(14)(a) Beginning on the date that the condition in (b) of this subsection is satisfied, a public facilities district created within a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 or more for the purpose of acquiring, owning, operating, renovating, and expanding a convention and trade center must make quarterly payments from tax revenue collected by a public facilities district as a result of the tax imposed in chapter 245, Laws of 2018 to a city in which the convention and trade center is located that has authorized on or before DecemberÂ 31, 2017, a tax on engaging in the business of being a short-term rental operator. Such payments must be made no more than ((thirty))30 days after the last day of each fiscal quarter and must equal the portion of the revenues received by the public facilities district during such fiscal quarter from the lodging taxes authorized under subsection (4) of this section that are determined by the department of revenue to be derived from the short-term rental activity within such city.(b) The public facilities district is not required to make any payments under this subsection (14) unless the city has repealed any ordinance authorizing a tax on engaging in the business of being a short-term rental operator.(c) The public facilities district is not required to make any payments to a city under this subsection (14), if the city, after satisfying the condition in (b) of this subsection imposes any tax specifically on the act of engaging in the business of being a short-term rental operator.(d) The proceeds of any payments made by a public facilities district to a city under this subsection (14) must be used by the city to support community-initiated equitable development and affordable housing programs, as determined by the city in its sole discretion.(15) 50 percent of any tax revenue collected by a public facilities district as a result of the tax imposed in chapter 245, Laws of 2018 must be distributed by the public facilities district to the county in which the convention and trade center is located. However, if a city has satisfied the condition in subsection (14)(b) of this section, payments made under this subsection to the county in which the convention and trade center is located must be calculated after deducting any payments made to a city under subsection (14) of this section from the total tax revenue received by the public facilities district as a result of the enactment of chapter 245, Laws of 2018. The proceeds of such payments to a county under this subsection (15) must be used by the county to support community-initiated equitable development and affordable housing programs, as determined by the county, in its sole discretion.Sec. 4. RCW 36.100.040 and 2018 c 245 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((A))The board of a public facilities district may impose an excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on any premises having fewer than ((forty))40 lodging units. ((Except for any tax imposed under subsection (4) or (5) of this section, if a public facilities district has not imposed such an excise tax prior to December 31, 1995, the public facilities district may only impose the excise tax if a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of the tax has been approved by a simple majority vote of voters of the public facilities district voting on the proposition.))(2) The rate of the tax may not exceed two percent and the proceeds of the tax may only be used for the acquisition, design, construction, remodeling, maintenance, equipping, reequipping, repairing, and operation of its public facilities. This excise tax may not be imposed until the district has approved the proposal to acquire, design, and construct the public facilities.(3) Except for a public facilities district created within a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))500,000 or more for the purpose of acquiring, owning, and operating a convention and trade center or performing arts center, a public facilities district may not impose the tax authorized in this section if, after the tax authorized in this section was imposed, the effective combined rate of state and local excise taxes, including sales and use taxes and excise taxes on lodging, imposed on the sale of or charge made for furnishing of lodging in any jurisdiction in the public facilities district exceeds ((eleven and one-half))11.5 percent.(4)(a) To replace the tax authorized by former RCW 67.40.090, a public facilities district created within a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 or more for the purpose of acquiring, owning, operating, renovating, and expanding a convention and trade center may impose an excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging (including but not limited to any short-term rental) that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on:(i) Any premises:(A) Having fewer than ((sixty))60 lodging units if the premises is located in a town with a population less than ((three hundred))300; or(B) Classified as a hostel;(ii) Any lodging that is concurrently subject to a tax on engaging in the business of being a short-term rental operator imposed by a city in which a convention and trade center is located; or(iii) Any lodging that is operated by a university health care system exclusively for family members of patients.(b) The rate of the tax may not exceed seven percent within the portion of the district that corresponds to the boundaries of the largest city within the public facilities district and may not exceed 2.8 percent in the remainder of the district. The tax imposed under this subsection (4) may not be collected prior to the transfer date defined in RCW 36.100.230.(5) To replace the tax authorized by former RCW 67.40.130, a public facilities district created within a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 or more for the purpose of acquiring, owning, operating, renovating, and expanding a convention and trade center may impose an additional excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging (including but not limited to any short-term rental) that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on any premises: (a) Having fewer than ((sixty))60 lodging units if the premises is located in a town with a population less than ((three hundred))300; or (b) classified as a hostel. The rate of the additional excise tax may not exceed two percent and may be imposed only within the portion of the district that corresponds to the boundaries of the largest city within the public facilities district and may not be imposed in the remainder of the district. The tax imposed under this subsection (5) may not be collected prior to the transfer date specified in RCW 36.100.230. The tax imposed under this subsection (5) must be credited against the amount of the tax otherwise due to the state from those same taxpayers under chapter 82.08 RCW. The tax under this subsection (5) may be imposed only for the purpose of paying or securing the payment of the principal of and interest on obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district and paying annual payment amounts to the state under subsection (6)(a) of this section. The authority to impose the additional excise tax under this subsection (5) expires on the date that is the earlier of (i) July 1, 2029, or (ii) the date on which all obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district to implement any redemption, prepayment, or legal defeasance of outstanding obligations under RCW 36.100.230(3)(a) are no longer outstanding.(6)(a) Commencing with the first full fiscal year of the state after the transfer date defined in RCW 36.100.230 and for so long as a public facilities district imposes a tax under subsection (5) of this section, the public facilities district must transfer to the state of Washington on June 30th of each state fiscal year an annual payment amount.(b) For the purposes of this subsection (6), "annual payment amount" means an amount equal to revenues received by the public facilities district in the fiscal year from the additional excise tax imposed under subsection (5) of this section plus an interest charge calculated on one-half the annual payment amount times an interest rate equal to the average annual rate of return for the prior calendar year in the Washington state local government investment pool created in chapter 43.250 RCW.(c)(i) If the public facilities district in any fiscal year is required to apply additional lodging excise tax revenues to the payment of principal and interest on obligations it issues or incurs, and the public facilities district is unable to pay all or any portion of the annual payment amount to the state, the deficiency is deemed to be a loan from the state to the public facilities district for the purpose of assisting the district in paying such principal and interest and must be repaid by the public facilities district to the state after providing for the payment of the principal of and interest on obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district, all on terms established by an agreement between the state treasurer and the public facilities district executed prior to the transfer date. Any agreement between the state treasurer and the public facilities district must specify the term for the repayment of the deficiency in the annual payment amount with an interest rate equal to the twenty bond general obligation bond buyer index plus one percentage point.(ii) Outstanding obligations to repay any loans deemed to have been made to the public facilities district as provided in any such agreements between the state treasurer and the public facilities district survive the expiration of the additional excise tax under subsection (5) of this section.(iii) For the purposes of this subsection (6)(c), "additional lodging excise tax revenues" mean the tax revenues received by the public facilities district under subsection (5) of this section.(7) A public facilities district is authorized to pledge any of its revenues, including without limitation revenues from the taxes authorized in this section, to pay or secure the payment of obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district, subject to the terms established by the board of directors of the public facilities district. So long as a pledge of the taxes authorized under this section is in effect, the legislature may not withdraw or modify the authority to levy and collect the taxes at the rates permitted under this section and may not increase the annual payment amount to be transferred to the state under subsection (6) of this section.(8) The department of revenue must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the public facilities district at no cost to the district, and the state treasurer must distribute those taxes as available on a monthly basis to the district or, upon the direction of the district, to a fiscal agent, paying agent, or trustee for obligations issued or incurred by the district.(9) Except as expressly provided in this chapter, all of the provisions contained in RCW 82.08.050 and 82.08.060 and chapter 82.32 RCW have full force and application with respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this section.(10) In determining the effective combined rate of tax for purposes of the limit in subsection (3) of this section, the tax rate under RCW 82.14.530 is not included.(11) The taxes imposed in this section do not apply to sales of temporary medical housing exempt under RCW 82.08.997.(12) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a)(i) "Hostel" means a structure or facility where a majority of the rooms for sleeping accommodations are hostel dormitories containing a minimum of four standard beds designed for single-person occupancy within the facility. Hostel accommodations are supervised and must include at least one common area and at least one common kitchen for guest use.(ii) For the purpose of this subsection (12)(a), "hostel dormitory" means a single room, containing four or more standard beds designed for single-person occupancy, used exclusively as nonprivate communal sleeping quarters, generally for unrelated persons, where such persons independently acquire the right to occupy individual beds, with the operator supervising and determining which bed each person will occupy.(b) "Short-term rental" means a lodging use, that is not a hotel or motel, in which a dwelling unit, or portion thereof, that is offered or provided to a guest or guests by a short-term rental operator for a fee for fewer than ((thirty))30 consecutive nights. The term "short-term rental" does not include:(i) A dwelling unit, or portion thereof, that is used by the same person for ((thirty))30 or more consecutive nights; and(ii) A dwelling unit, or portion thereof, that is operated by an organization or government entity that is registered as a charitable organization with the secretary of state, state of Washington, and/or is classified by the federal internal revenue service as a public charity or a private foundation, and provides temporary housing to individuals who are being treated for trauma, injury, or disease and/or their family members.(13) Taxes authorized under subsections (4) and (5) of this section are deemed to have been imposed on December 1, 2000, for the purposes of RCW 82.14.410.(14)(a) Beginning on the date that the condition in (b) of this subsection is satisfied, a public facilities district created within a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 or more for the purpose of acquiring, owning, operating, renovating, and expanding a convention and trade center must make quarterly payments from tax revenue collected by a public facilities district as a result of the tax imposed in chapter 245, Laws of 2018 to a city in which the convention and trade center is located that has authorized on or before DecemberÂ 31, 2017, a tax on engaging in the business of being a short-term rental operator. Such payments must be made no more than ((thirty))30 days after the last day of each fiscal quarter and must equal the portion of the revenues received by the public facilities district during such fiscal quarter from the lodging taxes authorized under subsection (4) of this section that are determined by the department of revenue to be derived from the short-term rental activity within such city.(b) The public facilities district is not required to make any payments under this subsection (14) unless the city has repealed any ordinance authorizing a tax on engaging in the business of being a short-term rental operator.(c) The public facilities district is not required to make any payments to a city under this subsection (14), if the city, after satisfying the condition in (b) of this subsection imposes any tax specifically on the act of engaging in the business of being a short-term rental operator.(d) The proceeds of any payments made by a public facilities district to a city under this subsection (14) must be used by the city to support community-initiated equitable development and affordable housing programs, as determined by the city in its sole discretion.(15) Fifty percent of any tax revenue collected by a public facilities district as a result of the tax imposed in chapter 245, Laws of 2018 must be distributed by the public facilities district to the county in which the convention and trade center is located. However, if a city has satisfied the condition in subsection (14)(b) of this section, payments made under this subsection to the county in which the convention and trade center is located must be calculated after deducting any payments made to a city under subsection (14) of this section from the total tax revenue received by the public facilities district as a result of the enactment of chapter 245, Laws of 2018. The proceeds of such payments to a county under this subsection (15) must be used by the county to support affordable housing programs, as determined by the county, in its sole discretion.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2035.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2035.--- END ---